Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4746.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 14n. Not later than 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and subject to and in accordance with federal law, the department shall issue a chip-enabled Michigan bridge card to a recipient of food assistance or cash assistance benefits in compliance with applicable industry standards as published by the Accredited Standards Committee X9. The department shall continuously upgrade the Michigan bridge card with any future enhanced security features that would replace or complement the chip-enabling feature. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor